pt-PT: Tipo de cabo do portátil: Cabo de antena; Cabo de áudio; Cabo da bateria; Cabo da câmara; Cabo de entrada DC; Cabo de ecrã; Cabo de entrada de auscultadores; Cabo da placa IO; Cabo flex do teclado; Cabo LVDS; Cabo flex do touchpad; Cabo flex do trackpad; Cabo USB; Cabo eDP; Outro
es: Tipo de cable del portátil: Cable de antena; Cable de audio; Cable de batería; Cable de cámara; Cable del conector de alimentación DC; Cable de pantalla; Cable del conector de auriculares; Cable de la placa IO; Cable flexible del teclado; Cable LVDS; Cable flexible del touchpad; Cable flexible del trackpad; Cable USB; Cable eDP; Otros
da: Laptop-kabeltype: Antennekabel; Lydkabel; Batterikabel; Kamerakabel; DC strømstikkabel; Skærmkabel; Hovedtelefonstikkabel; IO-kortkabel; Tastatur fleksibel kabel; LVDS-kabel; Touchpad fleksibel kabel; Trackpad fleksibel kabel; USB-kabel; eDP-kabel; Andet
fr: Type de câble d’ordinateur portable: Câble d'antenne; Câble audio; Câble de batterie; Câble de caméra; Câble de prise d'alimentation CC; Câble d'affichage; Câble de prise casque; Câble de carte E/S; Câble flexible de clavier; Câble LVDS; Câble flexible de pavé tactile; Câble flexible de pavé tactile; Câble USB; Câble eDP; Autre
vi: Loại cáp máy tính xách tay: Cáp ăng-ten; Cáp âm thanh; Cáp pin; Cáp camera; Cáp jack nguồn DC; Cáp màn hình; Cáp jack tai nghe; Cáp bo IO; Cáp dẻo bàn phím; Cáp LVDS; Cáp dẻo touchpad; Cáp dẻo trackpad; Cáp USB; Cáp eDP; Khác
th: ประเภทสายเคเบิลแล็ปท็อป: สายอากาศ; สายเสียง; สายแบตเตอรี่; สายกล้อง; สายแจ็คไฟ DC; สายจอแสดงผล; สายแจ็คหูฟัง; สายบอร์ด IO; สายแพคีย์บอร์ด; สาย LVDS; สายแพทัชแพด; สายแพแทร็กแพด; สาย USB; สาย eDP; อื่นๆ
nl: Type laptopkabel: Antennekabel; Audiokabel; Batterijkabel; Camerakabel; DC-voedingsaansluiting kabel; Beeldschermkabel; Hoofdtelefoonaansluiting kabel; IO-boardkabel; Toetsenbord flexkabel; LVDS-kabel; Touchpad flexkabel; Trackpad flexkabel; USB-kabel; eDP-kabel; Andere
fi: Kannettavan kaapelin tyyppi: Antennikaapeli; Äänikaapeli; Akkukaapeli; Kamerakaapeli; DC-virtaliittimen kaapeli; Näyttökaapeli; Kuulokeliittimen kaapeli; IO-levyn kaapeli; Näppäimistön liitosjohto; LVDS-kaapeli; Kosketuslevyn liitosjohto; Ohjauslevyn liitosjohto; USB-kaapeli; eDP-kaapeli; Muu
el: Τύπος καλωδίου φορητού υπολογιστή: Καλώδιο κεραίας; Καλώδιο ήχου; Καλώδιο μπαταρίας; Καλώδιο κάμερας; Καλώδιο υποδοχής τροφοδοσίας DC; Καλώδιο οθόνης; Καλώδιο υποδοχής ακουστικών; Καλώδιο πλακέτας IO; Εύκαμπτο καλώδιο πληκτρολογίου; Καλώδιο LVDS; Εύκαμπτο καλώδιο επιφάνειας αφής; Εύκαμπτο καλώδιο trackpad; Καλώδιο USB; Καλώδιο eDP; Άλλο
nb: Type bærbar PC-kabel: Antennekabel; Lydkabel; Batterikabel; Kamerakabel; DC-strømkontakt-kabel; Skjermkabel; Hodetelefonkontakt-kabel; IO-kortkabel; Tastatur flekskabel; LVDS-kabel; Styreplate flekskabel; Pekeplate flekskabel; USB-kabel; eDP-kabel; Annet
tr: Dizüstü kablo tipi: Anten kablosu; Ses kablosu; Batarya kablosu; Kamera kablosu; DC güç girişi kablosu; Ekran kablosu; Kulaklık girişi kablosu; IO kartı kablosu; Klavye esnek kablosu; LVDS kablosu; Dokunmatik yüzey esnek kablosu; İzleme yüzeyi esnek kablosu; USB kablosu; eDP kablosu; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ kábla notebooku: Anténny kábel; Audio kábel; Kábel batérie; Kábel kamery; Kábel DC napájacieho konektora; Kábel displeja; Kábel slúchadlového konektora; Kábel IO dosky; Flexibilný kábel klávesnice; LVDS kábel; Flexibilný kábel touchpadu; Flexibilný kábel trackpadu; USB kábel; eDP kábel; Iné
zh-TW: 筆記型電腦纜線類型: 天線線纜; 音訊線纜; 電池線纜; 鏡頭線纜; DC 電源接口線纜; 顯示線纜; 耳機接口線纜; IO 板線纜; 鍵盤排線; LVDS 線纜; 觸控板排線; 軌跡板排線; USB 線纜; eDP 線纜; 其他
ko: 노트북 케이블 유형: 안테나 케이블; 오디오 케이블; 배터리 케이블; 카메라 케이블; DC 전원 잭 케이블; 디스플레이 케이블; 헤드폰 잭 케이블; IO 보드 케이블; 키보드 플렉스 케이블; LVDS 케이블; 터치패드 플렉스 케이블; 트랙패드 플렉스 케이블; USB 케이블; eDP 케이블; 기타
bg-BG: Тип кабел за лаптоп: Антенен кабел; Аудио кабел; Кабел на батерията; Кабел на камерата; Кабел на DC захранващ жак; Кабел на дисплея; Кабел на жак за слушалки; Кабел на IO платка; Гъвкав кабел за клавиатура; LVDS кабел; Гъвкав кабел за тъчпад; Гъвкав кабел за тракпад; USB кабел; eDP кабел; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de cabo do laptop: Cabo de antena; Cabo de áudio; Cabo da bateria; Cabo da câmera; Cabo do conector DC de energia; Cabo de vídeo; Cabo do conector de fone de ouvido; Cabo da placa de E/S; Cabo flexível do teclado; Cabo LVDS; Cabo flexível do touchpad; Cabo flexível do trackpad; Cabo USB; Cabo eDP; Outro
sl-SI: Tip kabla prenosnika: Antenski kabel; Avdio kabel; Kabel baterije; Kabel kamere; DC napajalni kabel; Kabel zaslona; Kabel za slušalke; Kabel V/I plošče; Upogljivi kabel tipkovnice; LVDS kabel; Upogljivi kabel sledilne ploščice; Upogljivi kabel sledilne ploščice; USB kabel; eDP kabel; Drugo
de: Laptop-Kabeltyp: Antennenkabel; Audiokabel; Batteriekabel; Kamerakabel; DC-Strombuchsenkabel; Displaykabel; Kopfhörerbuchsenkabel; IO-Board-Kabel; Tastatur-Flachbandkabel; LVDS-Kabel; Touchpad-Flachbandkabel; Trackpad-Flachbandkabel; USB-Kabel; eDP-Kabel; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di cavo del laptop: Cavo antenna; Cavo audio; Cavo batteria; Cavo fotocamera; Cavo presa alimentazione DC; Cavo display; Cavo presa cuffie; Cavo scheda IO; Cavo flessibile tastiera; Cavo LVDS; Cavo flessibile touchpad; Cavo flessibile trackpad; Cavo USB; Cavo eDP; Altro
hr-HR: Tip kabela prijenosnog računala: Antenski kabel; Audio kabel; Kabel baterije; Kabel kamere; Kabel DC priključka za napajanje; Kabel zaslona; Kabel priključka za slušalice; Kabel IO ploče; Savitljivi kabel tipkovnice; LVDS kabel; Savitljivi kabel dodirne ploče; Savitljivi kabel dodirne površine; USB kabel; eDP kabel; Ostalo
hu: Laptopkábel típusa: Antenna kábel; Audio kábel; Akkumulátor kábel; Kamera kábel; DC táp csatlakozó kábel; Kijelző kábel; Fejhallgató csatlakozó kábel; IO panel kábel; Billentyűzet szalagkábel; LVDS kábel; Érintőpad szalagkábel; Nyomkövető pad szalagkábel; USB kábel; eDP kábel; Egyéb
lt-LT: Nešiojamojo kompiuterio kabelio tipas: Antenos kabelis; Garso kabelis; Baterijos kabelis; Kameros kabelis; Nuolatinės srovės maitinimo lizdo kabelis; Ekrano kabelis; Ausinių lizdo kabelis; IO plokštės kabelis; Klaviatūros lankstus kabelis; LVDS kabelis; Jutiklinio kilimėlio lankstus kabelis; Liečiamojo kilimėlio lankstus kabelis; USB kabelis; eDP kabelis; Kita
ro-RO: Tip cablu laptop: Cablu antenă; Cablu audio; Cablu baterie; Cablu cameră; Cablu mufă alimentare DC; Cablu display; Cablu mufă căști; Cablu placă IO; Cablu flexibil tastatură; Cablu LVDS; Cablu flexibil touchpad; Cablu flexibil trackpad; Cablu USB; Cablu eDP; Altele
cs: Typ kabelu notebooku: Anténní kabel; Audio kabel; Kabel baterie; Kabel kamery; Kabel napájecí DC zdířky; Kabel displeje; Kabel sluchátkové zdířky; Kabel IO desky; Plochý kabel klávesnice; LVDS kabel; Plochý kabel touchpadu; Plochý kabel trackpadu; USB kabel; eDP kabel; Jiné
ja: ラップトップケーブルタイプ: アンテナケーブル; オーディオケーブル; バッテリーケーブル; カメラケーブル; DC電源ジャックケーブル; ディスプレイケーブル; ヘッドホンジャックケーブル; IOボードケーブル; キーボードフレックスケーブル; LVDSケーブル; タッチパッドフレックスケーブル; トラックパッドフレックスケーブル; USBケーブル; eDPケーブル; その他
ru: Тип кабеля ноутбука: Кабель антенны; Аудиокабель; Кабель батареи; Кабель камеры; Кабель разъёма питания DC; Кабель дисплея; Кабель разъёма наушников; Кабель платы ввода-вывода; Гибкий кабель клавиатуры; Кабель LVDS; Гибкий кабель тачпада; Гибкий кабель трекпада; USB-кабель; Кабель eDP; Другой
sv: Bärbar datorkabeltyp: Antennkabel; Ljudkabel; Batterikabel; Kamerakabel; DC-strömjackkabel; Bildskärmskabel; Hörlursjackkabel; IO-kortkabel; Tangentbordsflexkabel; LVDS-kabel; Styrplatteflexkabel; Pekplatteflexkabel; USB-kabel; eDP-kabel; Övrigt
zh-CN: 笔记本电脑线缆类型: 天线线缆; 音频线缆; 电池线缆; 摄像头线缆; DC 电源插口线缆; 显示线缆; 耳机插口线缆; IO 板线缆; 键盘排线; LVDS 线缆; 触控板排线; 触控板排线; USB 线缆; eDP 线缆; 其他
pl: Typ kabla do laptopa: Kabel antenowy; Kabel audio; Kabel baterii; Kabel kamery; Kabel gniazda zasilania DC; Kabel wyświetlacza; Kabel gniazda słuchawkowego; Kabel płyty IO; Taśma klawiatury; Kabel LVDS; Taśma touchpada; Taśma trackpada; Kabel USB; Kabel eDP; Inne
en: Laptop cable type: Antenna cable; Audio cable; Battery cable; Camera cable; DC power jack cable; Display cable; Headphone jack cable; IO board cable; Keyboard flex cable; LVDS cable; Touchpad flex cable; Trackpad flex cable; USB cable; eDP cable; Other